Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20258-2730
Licensee; net worth requirements.

(1) A licensee shall maintain at all times a net worth of the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or three percent of the licensee's total assets for the first one hundred million dollars, two percent of additional assets for over one hundred million dollars to one billion dollars, and one-half percent of additional assets for over one billion dollars.

(2) Net worth shall be demonstrated at initial application by the applicant's most recent audited or, if allowed by the director, unaudited financial statements provided pursuant to subdivision (2)(f) of section 8-2711.

(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the director shall have the authority, for good cause shown, to exempt any applicant or licensee, in part or in whole, from the requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section.

Laws 2013, LB616, § 30;

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 55;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 35.